praksid/praks5/maris-kodutöö/praks5_jätkud.lexc
LEXICON tüüp_kolm
    +Sg+Nom: # ;
    :e 2C; 

LEXICON tüüp_paar
    +Sg+Nom: # ;
    :i 2C ;

LEXICON 2C
    : sg_gen_jt ; 
    +Sg+Par: # ;
    +Pl+Gen:%>de # ;
    +Pl:%>de semkäänded ;
    +Pl+Par:%>sid # ;

LEXICON tüüp_sada
    +Sg+Nom: # ;
    :%{NA%} sg_gen_jt ; 
    +Sg+Par: # ;
    +Pl+Gen:%>de # ;
    +Pl:%>de semkäänded ;
    +Pl+Par:%>sid # ;

LEXICON tüüp_kümmend
    +Sg+Nom:mend # ;
    :ne sg_gen_jt ; 
    +Sg+Par:net # ;
    +Pl+Gen:ne%>te # ;
    +Pl:ne%>te semkäänded ;
    +Pl+Par:ne%>id # ;


LEXICON sg_gen_jt
    +Sg+Gen: # ;
    +Sg: semkäänded ;
    +Pl+Nom:%>d # ;

LEXICON semkäänded

    +Ill:%>sse # ;
    +Ine:%>s # ;
    +Ela:%>st # ;
    +All:%>le # ;
    +Ade:%>l # ;
    +Abl:%>lt # ;
    +Tra:%>ks # ;
    +Ter:%>ni # ;
    +Ess:%>na # ;
    +Abe:%>ta # ;
    +Kom:%>ga # ;
